Idaho statutes. Title 62 RAILROADS AND OTHER PUBLIC UTILITIES
Chapter 10
FRAUDULENT CONSUMPTION OF GAS

Sec.

§ 62-1001. Tampering with gas meter or using gas not metered — Penalty.

Any person, who, with intent to injure or defraud any company, corporation, copartnership or individual, authorized to manufacture, generate, sell or use illuminating or inflammable gas for lighting, heating or power purposes, shall injure, alter, obstruct or prevent the action of any meter, provided for the purpose of measuring the quantity of gas consumed by, or at, any burner, orifice or place, or supplied to any lamp, stove, range, furnace, machine, motor, appliance or contrivance, or who shall cause, or procure, or aid, the injuring or altering of any such meter or the obstruction or prevention of its action, or who shall make or cause to be made, with any pipe, tube, or any appliance, any connection, so as to conduct or supply illuminating or inflammable gas to any burner, or orifice, or lamp, or stove, or range or furnace, or motor, or other machine or appliance from which such gas may be consumed or utilized without passing through, or being registered by such meter, without the permission, consent, or acquiescence of the company, corporation, copartnership, or individual, furnishing or transmitting such gas, or who shall knowingly use or utilize any such gas which has not passed through the meter provided for the registration of the consumption thereof, or who shall by any means, device, appliance or contrivance, knowingly use or utilize such gas for his own use, or for the use of another, with intent to evade payment thereof, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine not exceeding three hundred dollars ($300.00), or by imprisonment in the county jail for a term not exceeding six (6) months or by both such fine and imprisonment.

§ 62-1002. Search warrant upon suspected violation of preceding section.

Any such company, corporation, copartnership or individual, authorized to manufacture, generate, sell, or use illuminating or inflammable gas, who shall have probable cause to believe that any person, firm, company, copartnership or corporation is violating the provisions of this chapter, shall, upon making the affidavit required in, and complying with all the provisions of chapter 44 of title 19[, Idaho Code], be entitled to have a search warrant issued to it and served in the manner provided in said chapter 44 of title 19[, Idaho Code].

§ 62-1003. Right to civil action for damages not affected.

Nothing herein contained shall be deemed to affect the right of any company, corporation, copartnership, firm or individual, to recover by civil action, in any court of competent jurisdiction the reasonable value of such gas used, or damages for any injury done by such unlawful acts.